Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.360

Records—Maintenance—Availability of records and samples for inspection.

The seed labeling registrant whose name appears on the label shall:

(1) Keep, for a period of two years after the date of final disposition, complete records of each lot of seed distributed: PROVIDED, That the file sample of each lot of seed distributed need be kept for only one year.

(2) Make available, during regular working hours, such records and samples for inspection by the department.

[ 1969 c 63 s 36.]